District of Columbia statutes.
16-2356

Parties.

Parties to a proceeding for the termination of the parent and child relationship shall be the child, the parent of the named child, and the agency having the legal custody of the child. The judge may at his or her discretion, name on his or her own motion or in response to a motion for joinder or intervention, join additional parties to a proceeding to terminate the parent and child relationship.

History

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 410, 24 DCR 3341

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2356.
1973 Ed., § 16-2356.